District of Columbia statutes.
47-882

Establishment of special assessment district.

There is hereby established the New York Avenue Metrorail Benefit Area, which shall comprise those tax lots substantially within 2,500 feet from the entrances of the proposed in-fill rail transit station and which are not within 1,250 feet of the existing Union Station rail transit station, more particularly described as all lots included in the following squares or parcels: 616, 617, 618, 619, 620, 621, 668, 669, 670, 671, 672, 673, 674, 709, 710, 710E, 711, 711E, 712, 713, 714, 747, 747N, 748, 749, 772, 772N, 773, 774, 804, 805, 806, 828, 829, 830, 855, 855N, 856, 886, 887, 3514, 3516, 3518, 3519, 3520, 3521, 3522, 3523, 3524, 3527, 3569, 3570, 3571, 3572, 3573, 3574, 3575, 3576, 3580, 3581, 3582, 3583, 3584, 3585, 3587, 3588, 3589, 3590, 3591, 3592, 3593, 3594, 3598, 3600, 3601, 3602, 3603, 3605, 3606, and 3607, and RES0278 and parcel 117; within parcel 129, lots 9, 10, 27, 28, 30, 32, 34, 43, 45, 51, 57, 70, 77, 89, 90, 95, 96, 102, 103, 104, 106, and 112; within parcel 130, lots 57 and 58, and within parcel 141, lot 69.

Oct. 26, 2001, D.C. Law 14-44, § 2, 48 DCR 7665
This section is referenced in § 47-881.
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of New York Avenue Metro Special Assessment Authorization Temporary Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-25, October 2, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 9564).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2 of New York Avenue Metro Special Assessment Authorization Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-64, June 6, 2001, 48 DCR 5714).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2 of New York Avenue Metro Special Assessment Authorization Legislative Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-115, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7652).